Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 2. Standards of Conduct.

Sec. 24.60.030.
Prohibited conduct and conflicts of interest.

A legislator or legislative employee may not

solicit, agree to accept, or accept a benefit other than official compensation for the performance of public duties; this paragraph may not be construed to prohibit lawful solicitation for and acceptance of campaign contributions, solicitation or acceptance of contributions for a charity event, as defined in AS

24.60.080

(a)(2)(B), or the acceptance of a gift under AS

24.60.075

or

24.60.080

;

use public funds, facilities, equipment, services, or another government asset or resource for a nonlegislative purpose, for involvement in or support of or opposition to partisan political activity, or for the private benefit of the legislator, legislative employee, or another person; this paragraph does not prohibit

limited use of state property and resources for personal purposes if the use does not interfere with the performance of public duties and either the cost or value related to the use is nominal or the legislator or legislative employee reimburses the state for the cost of the use;

the use of mailing lists, computer data, or other information lawfully obtained from a government agency and available to the general public for nonlegislative purposes;

the legislative council, notwithstanding AS

24.05.190

, from designating a public facility for use by legislators and legislative employees for health or fitness purposes; when the council designates a facility to be used by legislators and legislative employees for health or fitness purposes, it shall adopt guidelines governing access to and use of the facility; the guidelines may establish times in which use of the facility is limited to specific groups;

a legislator from using the legislator’s private office in the capital city during a legislative session, and for the 10 days immediately before and the 10 days immediately after a legislative session, for nonlegislative purposes if the use does not interfere with the performance of public duties and if there is no cost to the state for the use of the space and equipment, other than utility costs and minimal wear and tear, or the legislator promptly reimburses the state for the cost; an office is considered a legislator’s private office under this subparagraph if it is the primary space in the capital city reserved for use by the legislator, whether or not it is shared with others;

a legislator from use of legislative employees to prepare and send out seasonal greeting cards;

a legislator from using state resources to transport computers or other office equipment owned by the legislator but primarily used for a state function;

use by a legislator of photographs of that legislator;

reasonable use of the Internet by a legislator or a legislative employee except if the use is for election campaign purposes;

a legislator or legislative employee from soliciting, accepting, or receiving a gift on behalf of a recognized, nonpolitical charitable organization in a state facility;

a legislator from sending any communication in the form of a newsletter to the legislator’s constituents, except a communication expressly advocating the election or defeat of a candidate or a newsletter or material in a newsletter that is clearly only for the private benefit of a legislator or a legislative employee; or

full participation in a charity event approved in advance by the Alaska Legislative Council;

knowingly seek, accept, use, allocate, grant, or award public funds for a purpose other than that approved by law, or make a false statement in connection with a claim, request, or application for compensation, reimbursement, or travel allowances from public funds;

require a legislative employee to perform services for the private benefit of the legislator or employee at any time, or allow a legislative employee to perform services for the private benefit of a legislator or employee on government time; it is not a violation of this paragraph if the services were performed in an unusual or infrequent situation and the person’s services were reasonably necessary to permit the legislator or legislative employee to perform official duties;

use or authorize the use of state funds, facilities, equipment, services, or another government asset or resource for the purpose of political fund raising or campaigning; this paragraph does not prohibit

limited use of state property and resources for personal purposes if the use does not interfere with the performance of public duties and either the cost or value related to the use is nominal or the legislator or legislative employee reimburses the state for the cost of the use;

the use of mailing lists, computer data, or other information lawfully obtained from a government agency and available to the general public for nonlegislative purposes;

storing or maintaining, consistent with (b) of this section, election campaign records in a legislator’s office;

a legislator from using the legislator’s private office in the capital city during a legislative session, and for the 10 days immediately before and the 10 days immediately after a legislative session, for nonlegislative purposes if the use does not interfere with the performance of public duties and if there is no cost to the state for the use of the space and equipment, other than utility costs and minimal wear and tear, or the legislator promptly reimburses the state for the cost; an office is considered a legislator’s private office under this subparagraph if it is the primary space in the capital city reserved for use by the legislator, whether or not it is shared with others; or

use by a legislator of photographs of that legislator.

A legislative employee may not on government time assist in political party or candidate activities, campaigning, or fund raising. A legislator may not require an employee to perform an act in violation of this subsection.

Unless approved by the committee, during a campaign period for an election in which the legislator or legislative employee is a candidate, a legislator or legislative employee may not use or permit another to use state funds, other than funds to which the legislator is entitled under AS

24.10.110

, to print or distribute a political mass mailing to individuals eligible to vote for the candidate. In this subsection,

a “campaign period” is the period that

begins 60 days before the date of an election to the board of an electric or telephone cooperative organized under AS 10.25, a municipal election, or a primary election, or that begins on the date of the governor’s proclamation calling a special election; and

ends the day after the cooperative election, municipal election, or general or special election;

a mass mailing is considered to be political if it is from or about a legislator, legislative employee, or another person who is a candidate for election or reelection to the legislature or another federal, state, or municipal office or to the board of an electric or telephone cooperative.

A legislator, legislative employee, or another person on behalf of the legislator or legislative employee, or a campaign committee of the legislator or legislative employee, may not distribute or post campaign literature, placards, posters, fund-raising notices, or other communications intended to influence the election of a candidate in an election in public areas in a facility ordinarily used to conduct state government business. This prohibition applies whether or not the election has been concluded. However, a legislator may post, in the legislator’s private office, communications related to an election that has been concluded.

A legislator may not directly, or by authorizing another to act on the legislator’s behalf,

agree to, threaten to, or state or imply that the legislator will take or withhold a legislative, administrative, or political action, including support for or opposition to a bill, employment, nominations, and appointments, as a result of a person’s decision to provide or not provide a political contribution, donate or not donate to a cause favored by the legislator, or provide or not provide a thing of value;

state or imply that the legislator will perform or refrain from performing a lawful constituent service as a result of a person’s decision to provide or not provide a political contribution, donate or not donate to a cause favored by the legislator, or provide or not provide a thing of value; or

unless required by the Uniform Rules of the Alaska State Legislature, take or withhold legislative action that is likely to substantially benefit or harm the financial interest of the legislator, the legislator’s spouse, or a person with whom the legislator or the legislator’s spouse is employed or is negotiating for employment.

A legislative employee may not serve in a position that requires confirmation by the legislature. A legislator or legislative employee who serves on a board of an organization, including a governmental entity, shall disclose the board membership to the committee. A person required to make a disclosure under this subsection shall file the disclosure with the committee by the deadlines set out in AS

24.60.105

stating the name of each organization on whose board the person serves. The committee shall maintain a public record of the disclosure and forward the disclosure to the appropriate house for inclusion in the journal. This subsection does not require a legislator or legislative employee who is appointed to a board by the presiding officer to make a disclosure of the appointment to the committee if the appointment has been published in the appropriate legislative journal during the calendar year.

Unless otherwise required by the Uniform Rules of the Alaska State Legislature, a legislator shall declare a conflict of interest before voting on a question before a committee of the legislature, and shall request to be excused from voting on a question before a house of the legislature if the effect of the vote is likely to substantially benefit or harm the financial interest of the legislator, the legislator’s spouse, or a person with whom the legislator or the legislator’s spouse is employed or is negotiating for employment.

An employee who engages in political campaign activities other than incidental campaign activities during the employee’s work day shall take leave for the period of campaigning. Political campaign activities while on government time are permissible if the activities are part of the normal legislative duties of the employee, including answering telephone calls and handling incoming correspondence.

A legislator or legislative employee may not attempt to influence the outcome of an administrative hearing by directly or indirectly contacting or attempting to contact the hearing officer assigned to the hearing or the individual, board, or commission with authority to make the final decision in the matter unless

the legislator or legislative employee is representing another person for compensation subject to AS

24.60.100

and as a professional who is licensed in the state;

the contact is made in the presence of all parties to the hearing or the parties’ representatives while the legislator or legislative employee is acting as a party or a witness in the matter or responding to a question asked of the legislator or legislative employee by the hearing officer, individual, board, or commission and the contact is made a part of the record; or

the contact is inadvertent and ex parte and the legislator or legislative employee

promptly discloses the fact and substance of the contact

directly to each party to the hearing whose identity as a party is public information; or

through the hearing officer for each party to the hearing whose identity as a party is not public information; and

makes the fact and substance of the contact part of the record.

In this section,

“administrative hearing” means a quasi-judicial hearing before an agency; “administrative hearing” does not include an informal conference or review held by an agency before a final decision is issued or a rate-making proceeding or other nonadjudicative public hearing;

“financial interest” means a substantial equity or ownership interest in a business, investment, real property, lease, or other enterprise;

“substantially benefit or harm” means the effect on the person’s financial interest is greater than the effect on the financial interest of a substantial class of persons to which the person belongs as a member of a profession, occupation, industry, or region.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am § 27 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 8 ch 167 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 127 SLA 1992; am §§ 13 — 18 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 8 ch 3 SLA 2002; am § 49 ch 163 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 10 SLA 2006; am §§ 19 — 21 ch 47 SLA 2007; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 45 SLA 2012; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 61 SLA 2018; am §§
2 — 5 ch 5 SLA 2019)

Revisor's Notes. —

The paragraphs in subsection (j) were renumbered in 2019 to maintain alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For bribery and related offenses, see AS

11.56.100

—

11.56.130

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 20, 2018, rewrote (e)(3) and (g); added (j)(2) [now (j)(3)], and made related changes. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 17, ch. 61, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 19, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 20, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

The 2019 amendment, effective May 25, 2019, rewrote (e)(3) and (g); in (j), substituted “a substantial class of persons to which the person belongs as a member of a profession, occupation, industry, or region” for “the general public of the state” in (j)(2) [now (j)(3)], and added (j)(3) [now (j)(2)].

Editor's notes. —

For provision relating to the severability of the 2018 amendments to this section, see sec. 15, ch. 61, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Opinions of attorney general. —

An initiative petition, known as 17 AKGA, was certified by the Lieutenant Governor to appear on the November 2018 ballot; it related broadly to campaign finance, public official integrity, and good governance. During the legislative session the legislature enacted HB 44 (Chapter 61, SLA 2018), similarly relating, inter alia, to campaign expenditures and contributions, the legislators' per diem, gifts by lobbyists, and voting or other actions by a legislator where the legislator had a conflict of interest. Under
AS

15.45.210

, where an act of the legislature is substantially the same as a petition, is enacted after the petition has been filed and before the date of the election, the petition is void. Following the passage of HB 44, the Lieutenant Governor determined, and the Attorney General agreed, that the initiative petition known as 17 AKGA, and HB 44, were substantially the same, rendering 17 AKGA void and ineligible to appear on the ballot. 2018 Op. Alaska Att'y Gen. (May 25).

Sec. 24.60.031.
Restrictions on fund raising.

A legislative employee may not

on a day when either house of the legislature is in regular or special session, solicit or accept a contribution or a promise or pledge to make a contribution for a campaign for state or municipal office; however, a legislative employee may, except in the capital city or in the municipality in which the legislature is convened in special session if the legislature is convened in a municipality other than the capital city, solicit or accept a contribution, promise, or pledge for a campaign for state or municipal office that occurs during the 90 days immediately preceding the election for that office; or

accept money from an event held on a day when either house of the legislature is in regular or special session if a substantial purpose of the event is to raise money on behalf of the legislative employee for political purposes; however, this paragraph does not prohibit a legislative employee from accepting money from an event held in a place other than the capital city or a municipality in which the legislature is convened in special session if the legislature is convened in a municipality other than the capital city during the 90 days immediately preceding an election for state or municipal public office in which the legislative employee is a candidate.

A legislator may not

on a day when either house of the legislature is in regular or special session, solicit or accept a contribution or a promise or pledge to make a contribution

for the legislator’s own campaign for state or municipal public office, unless the solicitation, acceptance, promise, or pledge occurs in a place other than the capital city or a municipality in which the legislature is convened in special session if the legislature is convened in a municipality other than the capital city during the 90 days immediately preceding the election in which the legislator is a candidate;

for another candidate in an election for municipal, state, or federal office;

to influence a state ballot proposition or question; or

for a political party;

accept money from an event held on a day when either house of the legislature is in regular or special session if a substantial purpose of the event is to raise money on behalf of the legislator’s campaign for state or municipal public office; however, this paragraph does not prohibit a legislator from accepting money from an event held in a place other than the capital city or a municipality in which the legislature is convened in special session if the legislature is convened in a municipality other than the capital city during the 90 days immediately preceding a state or municipal election in which the legislator is a candidate; or

in a campaign for state or municipal office, expend money that was raised on a day when either house of the legislature was in a legislative session by or on behalf of a legislator under a declaration of candidacy or a general letter of intent to become a candidate for public office; however, this paragraph does not apply to money raised in a place other than the capital city or a municipality in which the legislature is convened in special session if the legislature is convened in a municipality other than the capital city during the 90 days immediately preceding an election in which the legislator is a candidate.

In this section, “contribution” has the meaning given in AS

15.13.400

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 27 ch 48 SLA 1996; am § 19 ch 74 SLA 1998; am §§ 2, 3 ch 106 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as (c); relettered in 2008, at which time subsection (b) was relettered as subsection (c).

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to the applicability of AS 15.13 to certain persons if a court determines that persons who are not individuals must be allowed to contribute to candidates or groups, see § 30, ch. 48, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 24.60.033.
Restrictions on employee candidacies.

A legislative employee may not file a letter of intent to become a candidate or file a declaration of candidacy for the legislature.

History.

(§ 4 ch 127 SLA 1992)

Sec. 24.60.035.
Protection of whistle blowers.

A legislator or legislative employee may not, directly or indirectly, subject a person who reports to the committee or another government entity conduct the person reasonably believes is a violation of this chapter or another state law, to reprisal, harassment, or discrimination. A legislative employee who is discharged, disciplined, involuntarily transferred, or otherwise penalized by a legislator or another legislative employee in violation of this subsection may

bring a complaint before the committee; and

bring a separate civil action in the courts seeking damages, payment of back wages, reinstatement, or other relief.

History.

(§ 4 ch 127 SLA 1992)

Sec. 24.60.037.
Open meetings guidelines.

A meeting of a legislative body is open to the public in accordance with the open meetings guidelines established in this section. A legislator may not participate in a meeting held in violation of these open meetings guidelines.

For purposes of the legislative open meetings guidelines, a meeting occurs when a majority of the members of a legislative body is present and action, including voting, is taken or could be taken, or if a primary purpose of the meeting is the discussion of legislation or state policy. The Uniform Rules of the Alaska State Legislature control the procedure for conducting open and executive sessions of a legislative body.

Legislators may meet in a closed caucus or in a private, informal meeting to discuss and deliberate on political strategy. Those meetings are exempt from the legislative open meetings guidelines. For purposes of this subsection, “political strategy” includes organization of the houses, assignment of committee membership, scheduling of bills, vehicles for adoptions, house-senate relations, other procedural matters, caucus operations, meetings between majority and minority caucus leaders, meetings between majority and minority caucus leaders of both houses, meetings with the governor, deliberations with regard to political strategy, and discussions of issues in the context of political strategy.

[Repealed, § 74 ch 47 SLA 2007.]

In cases where there are conflicts between these guidelines and the uniform rules adopted by the Alaska State Legislature, the uniform rules prevail.

The legislative open meetings guidelines are the guidelines that shall be used by the committee when considering complaints filed regarding open meetings.

In the legislative open meetings guidelines,

“caucus” means a group of legislators who share a political philosophy, or have a common goal, and who organize as a group;

“legislative body”

includes

the senate;

the house of representatives;

the senate and the house of representatives meeting in joint session;

a committee of the legislature, other than the Committee on Committees, but including a standing committee, special committee, joint committee, conference or free conference committee, committee of the whole, and permanent interim committee;

a legislative commission, task force, or other group established by statute or resolution; or

a caucus of members of one or more of the bodies set out in (i) — (v) of this subparagraph;

does not include

any committee or group of legislators considering only matters involving the organization of a committee or a house of the legislature, including selection of legislative officers;

any committee or group of legislators and the governor or staff of the Office of the Governor;

legislative leadership meetings;

officers of a caucus;

“meeting” does not include

a gathering of members of a legislative body for primarily ministerial or social purposes; or

forums where members of a legislative body have been invited to address a group on legislative issues or concerns.

History.

(§ 4 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 135 SLA 2004; am § 74 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Sec. 24.60.039.
Discrimination prohibited.

A legislator or legislative employee may not engage in acts of discrimination in violation of AS

18.80.220

.

If a person files a complaint with the committee under AS

24.60.170

alleging a violation of this section, the committee may refer the complainant to the State Commission for Human Rights and may defer its consideration of the complaint until after the complainant establishes to the satisfaction of the committee that the commission has completed its proceedings in the matter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 20 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Sec. 24.60.040.
Contracts or leases.

A legislator or legislative employee, or a member of the immediate family of a legislator or legislative employee, may not be a party to or have an interest in a state contract or lease unless the contract or lease is let under AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code) or, for agencies that are not subject to AS 36.30, under similar procedures, or the total annual amount of the state contract or lease is $5,000 or less, or is a standardized contract or lease that was developed under publicly established guidelines and is generally available to the public at large, members of a profession, occupation, or group. A person has an interest in a state contract or lease under this section if the person receives direct or indirect financial benefits. A legislator or legislative employee who participates in, or who knows or reasonably should know that a family member is participating in, a state contract or lease that has an annual value of $5,000 or more shall disclose the participation to the committee by the date required under AS

24.60.105

. The committee shall promptly forward the disclosure to the appropriate house for inclusion in the journal, and the presiding officer shall cause the disclosure to be published in the journal or in the supplemental journal not later than the next regularly scheduled publication of ethics disclosures. The legislator or legislative employee shall also disclose the renegotiation of a state contract or lease if the original had to be disclosed under this section or if, as a result of renegotiation, disclosure is required under this section. The disclosure must state the amount of the contract or lease and the name of the state agency issuing the contract or lease and must identify the procedures under which the contract or lease was issued. If the disclosure concerns a contract or lease in which a family member of the discloser is participating, the disclosure must identify the relationship between the participant and the discloser.

This section does not apply to a contract or lease issued under a state program or loan that is subject to AS

24.60.050

. A grant that results in a contract but that is not subject to AS

24.60.050

is subject to this section.

In this section, “direct or indirect financial benefits” means income, profits, or other financial benefits under a state contract, without regard to whether the income, profits, or other financial benefits ensue to the person as a partner, shareholder, investor, agent, employee, consultant, or joint venturer of the contractor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am § 24 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 113 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 127 SLA 1992; am §§ 21, 22 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 22 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as (c).
Relettered in 1998, at which time former (b) was relettered as (c).

Sec. 24.60.045.
Hazardous waste contracts. [Repealed, § 42 ch 127 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 24.60.050.
State programs and loans.

A legislator or legislative employee may, without disclosure to the committee, participate in a state benefit program or receive a loan from the state if the program or loan is generally available to members of the public, is subject to fixed, objective eligibility standards, and requires minimal discretion in determining qualification.

The committee shall review state benefit programs and state loans and annually publish a list of programs and loans, designating which ones do not meet the standards of (a) of this section.

A legislator or legislative employee who participates in a program or receives a loan that is not exempt from disclosure under (a) of this section shall file with the committee by the date required under AS

24.60.105

a disclosure stating the amounts of the loans outstanding or benefits received during the preceding calendar year from nonqualifying programs. If the committee requests additional information necessary to determine the propriety of participating in the program or receiving the loan, it shall be promptly provided. The committee shall maintain the disclosure as a public record and promptly forward the information contained in the disclosure to the presiding officer of each house who shall have it published in the supplemental journals on or before the next regularly scheduled publication of ethics disclosures. If a legislator or legislative employee asks the committee to keep any part of the disclosure confidential and a quorum of the committee determines by vote of a majority of committee members that making the entire disclosure public would cause an unjustifiable invasion of personal privacy, the committee may elect to publish only the fact that a person has participated in the program and the amount of benefit that the unnamed person received. The committee shall maintain the disclosure of the name of the person as confidential and may only use the disclosure in a proceeding under AS

24.60.170

. If the disclosure becomes part of the record of a proceeding under AS

24.60.170

, the disclosure may be made public as provided in that section.

If loan proceeds or other program benefits are received from nonqualifying programs or loans after the end of a calendar year, the legislator or legislative employee shall file a statement with the committee within 30 days after the beginning of participation in the state program or receipt of proceeds from the state loan or by the date required under AS

24.60.105

, whichever is later. If the committee receives the statement while the legislature is in session, it shall promptly forward the statement to the chief clerk of the house or the secretary of the senate, as appropriate, who shall cause it to be published in the supplemental journal. If the committee receives a statement while the legislature is not in session, it shall forward the statement to the chief clerk of the house or the secretary of the senate for publication when the legislature next convenes.

If the committee determines that a legislator or legislative employee received a state benefit or loan as a result of unfair or improper influence, the committee may initiate a complaint or take other appropriate action. In addition, the committee shall refer the matter to the attorney general for action under other civil or criminal laws.

The committee shall annually recommend to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee the programs and loans to be audited by the division of legislative audit during the following year, including the scope of the audit. The records of the relevant state agencies shall be made available to the division of legislative audit. The division of legislative audit shall prepare a report to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee on its findings. The report is confidential until it is released by the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am § 5 ch 113 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 167 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 23 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 14 ch 33 SLA 1999; am § 23 ch 47 SLA 2007; am § 4 ch 45 SLA 2012)

Sec. 24.60.060.
Confidential information.

A legislator, legislative employee, or public member of the committee may not knowingly make an unauthorized disclosure of information that is made confidential by law and that the person acquired in the course of official duties. A person who violates this section is subject to a proceeding under AS

24.60.170

and may be subject to prosecution under AS

11.56.860

or another law.

A legislator or legislative employee who is the subject of a complaint under AS

24.60.170

violates this section if the legislator or legislative employee violates a protective order issued under AS

24.60.170

(i).

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am § 7 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 24 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 45 SLA 2012)

Sec. 24.60.070.
Disclosure of close economic associations.

A legislator or legislative employee shall disclose to the committee, which shall maintain a public record of the disclosure and forward the disclosure to the respective house for inclusion in the journal, the formation or maintenance of a close economic association involving a substantial financial matter with

a supervisor who is not a member of the legislature who has responsibility or authority, either directly or indirectly, over the person’s employment, including preparing or reviewing performance evaluations, or granting or approving pay raises or promotions; this paragraph does not apply to a public member of the committee;

legislators;

a public official as that term is defined in AS 39.50;

a registered lobbyist; or

a legislative employee if the person required to make the disclosure is a legislator.

A legislator or legislative employee required to make a disclosure under this section shall make a disclosure by the date set under AS

24.60.105

of the legislator’s or legislative employee’s close economic associations then in existence. A disclosure under this section must be sufficiently detailed that a reader of the disclosure can ascertain the nature of the association.

When making a disclosure under (a) of this section concerning a relationship with a lobbyist to whom the legislative employee is married or who is the legislative employee’s domestic partner, the legislative employee shall also disclose the name and address of each employer of the lobbyist and the total monetary value received by the lobbyist from the lobbyist’s employer. The legislative employee shall report changes in the employer of the spouse or domestic partner within 48 hours after the change. In this subsection, “employer of the lobbyist” means the person from whom the lobbyist received amounts or things of value for engaging in lobbying on behalf of the person.

In this section, “close economic association” means a financial relationship that exists between a person covered by this chapter and some other person or entity, including but not limited to relationships where the person covered by this chapter serves as a consultant or advisor to, is a member or representative of, or has a financial interest in, any association, partnership, business, or corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am § 6 ch 113 SLA 1986; am §§ 8, 9 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 16 ch 6 SLA 1993; am §§ 25, 26 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 27 ch 108 SLA 2003; am §§ 24, 25 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (d).
Relettered in 1998, at which time former subsection (c) was relettered as (d).

Sec. 24.60.075.
Compassionate gift exemption.

Notwithstanding AS

24.45.121

and AS

24.60.080

, a person may give a compassionate gift to a legislator or legislative employee, and a legislator or a legislative employee may solicit, receive, or accept a compassionate gift from a person, subject to the limitations in (b) — (e) of this section.

A compassionate gift may not be solicited, accepted, or received unless a written request has been approved in writing by the chair of the legislative council, and the committee chair or vice-chair has approved in writing the decision of the chair of the legislative council.

A legislator or legislative employee who receives a compassionate gift, directly or indirectly, shall disclose to the committee the name of the gift’s source and the value of the gift within 30 days after receipt.

In this section, the value of a gift shall be determined by the fair market value of the gift, to the extent that the fair market value can be determined.

In this section, “compassionate gift” means a solicited or unsolicited gift intended to aid or comfort a recipient or a member of the recipient’s immediate family in contending with a catastrophe, a tragedy, or a health-related emergency.

History.

(§ 26 ch 47 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 2008)